Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1419.01
New recreational vehicles; applicability of sections.

Sections 60-1420 to 60-1440 shall not apply to any person, or business entity, that is engaging in manufacturing, distributing, or selling new recreational vehicles as defined in section 60-1445.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 72.
October 1, 2026